Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1925XS (3) 91 jm/md S.F. 439 Section 1. Section 384.12, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. a. A tax not to exceed twenty-seven 3 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for support of a 4 public library, subject to petition and referendum requirements 5 of paragraph âbâ . 6 b. A tax under paragraph âaâ shall be subject to all of the 7 following: 8 (1) Upon receipt of a valid petition pursuant to section 9 362.4, the council shall submit to the voters at the next 10 regular city election the question of whether a tax shall be 11 levied. 12 (2) If a majority of voters approve the levy, it shall be 13 imposed. 14 (3) The levy can be eliminated by the same procedure of 15 petition and election. 16 (4) A tax authorized by an election held prior to the 17 effective date of the city code may be continued until 18 eliminated by the council, or by petition and election. 19